Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 66

Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act

Publisher's Notes. For Comments regarding the Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act, see Commentaries Volume B.

Cross References. Guardianship of incapacitated persons, §28-65-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1961, No. 36, § 3: Feb. 6, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that the present laws pertaining to the investment of a ward's funds are inadequate; and thus immediate passage of this Act is necessary to remedy the situation; and therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

28-66-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Person” means an individual, a partnership, a corporation, or an association;

“Veterans' Administration” means the Veterans' Administration, its predecessors or successors;

“Income” means money received from the Veterans' Administration and revenue or profit from any property wholly or partially acquired therewith;

“Estate” means income on hand and assets acquired partially or wholly with income;

“Benefits” means all moneys paid or payable by the United States through the Veterans' Administration;

“Administrator” means the Administrator of Veterans Affairs of the United States or his successor;

“Ward” means a beneficiary of the Veterans' Administration;

“Guardian” means any fiduciary for the person or estate of a ward.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-501.

28-66-102. Administrator as party in interest.

The administrator shall be a party in interest in any proceeding for the appointment or removal of a guardian or for the removal of the disability of minority or mental incapacity of a ward, and in any suit or other proceeding affecting in any manner the administration by the guardian of the estate of any present or former ward whose estate includes assets derived in whole or in part from benefits heretofore or hereafter paid by the Veterans' Administration. Not less than fifteen (15) days prior to hearing in such matter notice in writing of the time and place thereof shall be given by mail (unless waived in writing) to the office of the Veterans' Administration having jurisdiction over the area in which any such suit or any such proceeding is pending.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-502.

28-66-103. Application.

Whenever, pursuant to any law of the United States or regulation of the Veterans' Administration, it is necessary, prior to payment of benefits, that a guardian be appointed, the appointment may be made in the manner hereinafter provided.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-503.

28-66-104. Limitation on number of wards.

No person other than a bank or trust company shall be guardian of more than five (5) wards at one (1) time, unless all the wards are members of one (1) family.

Upon presentation of a petition by an attorney of the Veterans' Administration or other interested person, alleging that a guardian is acting in a fiduciary capacity for more than five (5) wards as herein provided and requesting his discharge for that reason, the court, upon proof substantiating the petition, shall require a final accounting forthwith from such guardian and shall discharge him from guardianships in excess of five (5) and forthwith appoint a successor.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-504.

28-66-105. Appointment of guardians.

A petition for the appointment of a guardian may be filed by any relative or friend of the ward or by any person who is authorized by law to file such a petition. If there is no person so authorized or if the person so authorized refuses or fails to file such a petition within thirty (30) days after the mailing of notice by the Veterans' Administration to the last known address of the person, if any, indicating the necessity for the same, a petition for appointment may be filed by any resident of this state.

The petition for appointment shall set forth the name, age, place of residence of the ward, the name and place of residence of the nearest relative, if known, and the fact that the ward is entitled to receive benefits payable by or through the Veterans' Administration and shall set forth the amount of moneys then due and the amount of probable future payments.

The petition shall also set forth the name and address of the person or institution, if any, having actual custody of the ward and the name, age, relationship, if any, occupation, and address of the proposed guardian, and, if the nominee is a natural person, the number of wards for whom the nominee is presently acting as guardian.

Notwithstanding any law as to priority of persons entitled to appointment, or the nomination in the petition, the court may appoint some other individual or a bank or trust company as guardian, if the court determines it is for the best interest of the ward.

In the case of a mentally incompetent ward, the petition shall show that such ward has been rated incompetent by the Veterans' Administration on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the Veterans' Administration.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-505.

28-66-106. Evidence of necessity for guardian for infant.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian for a minor, a certificate of the administrator or his authorized representative, setting forth the age of such minor as shown by the records of the Veterans' Administration and the fact that the appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due the minor by the Veterans' Administration, shall be prima facie evidence of the necessity for such appointment.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-506.

28-66-107. Evidence of necessity for guardian for incompetent.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian for a mentally incompetent ward, a certificate of the administrator or his duly authorized representative that such person has been rated incompetent by the Veterans' Administration on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing such Veterans' Administration and that the appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due such ward by the Veterans' Administration shall be prima facie evidence of the necessity for such appointment.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-507.

28-66-108. Notice.

Upon the filing of a petition for the appointment of a guardian under this chapter, notice shall be given to the ward, to such other persons, and in such manner as is provided by the general law of this state, and also to the Veterans' Administration as provided by this chapter.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 8;
A.S.A. 1947, § 57-508.

28-66-109. Bond.

Upon the appointment of a guardian, he shall execute and file a bond to be approved by the court in an amount not less than the estimated value of the personal estate and anticipated income of the ward during the ensuing year. The bond shall be in the form and be conditioned as required of guardians appointed under the general guardianship laws of this state. The court may from time to time require the guardian to file an additional bond.

Where a bond is tendered by a guardian with personal sureties, there shall be at least two (2) such sureties, and they shall file with the court a certificate under oath which shall describe the property owned, both real and personal, and shall state that each is worth the sum named in the bond as the penalty thereof over and above all his debts and liabilities and the aggregate of other bonds on which he is principal or surety and exclusive of property exempt from execution. The court may require additional security or may require a corporate surety bond, the premium thereon to be paid from the ward's estate.

At the time of filing in the court any account, a certified copy thereof and a signed duplicate of each certificate filed with the court shall be sent by the guardian to the office of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs having jurisdiction over the area in which the court is located. A signed duplicate or a certified copy of any petition, motion, or other pleading, pertaining to an account, or to any matter other than an account and which is filed in the guardianship proceedings or in any proceeding for the purpose of removing the disability of minority or mental incapacity, shall be furnished by the person filing the same to the proper office of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. Unless the hearing be waived in writing by the attorney of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and by all other persons, if any, entitled to notice, the court shall fix a time and place for the hearing on the account, petition, motion, or other pleading not less than fifteen (15) days nor more than thirty (30) days from the date same is filed, unless a different available date be stipulated in writing. Unless waived in writing, written notice of the time and place of hearing shall be given the United States Department of Veterans Affiars office concerned and the guardian and any others entitled to notice not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the date fixed for the hearing. The notice may be given by mail in which event it shall be deposited in the mails not less than fifteen (15) days prior to said date. The court, or clerk thereof, shall mail to said United States Department of Veterans Affairs office a copy of each order entered in any guardianship proceeding wherein the administrator is an interested party.

If the guardian is accountable for property derived from sources other than the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, he shall be accountable as is or may be required under the applicable law of this state pertaining to the property of minors or persons of unsound mind who are not beneficiaries of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and as to such other property shall be entitled to the compensation provided by such law. The account for other property may be combined with the account filed in accordance with this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The language added by the amendment of this section by Acts 2005, No. 658, is not part of an official NCCUSL revision of the 1942 Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act.

When the guardian of an incompetent veteran presented a settlement to the probate court, the proceeding was not adversary in the sense that the ward had to be represented by one especially appointed for that purpose; rather, it was the court's duty to examine the account and to take such steps as were necessary to verify the guardian's fidelity. Lingo v. Rainwater, 199 Ark. 618, 136 S.W.2d 161 (1940) (decision under prior law).

A guardian's account made after the death of a ward would not be reopened on motion of an administrator because of payments made after the death of the ward where such payments were approved by a representative of the Veterans' Bureau and the probate court, and the same payments would be required to be made by the administrator if the administrator received the money. Hicks v. Johnson, 196 Ark. 103, 116 S.W.2d 597 (1938) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-509.

28-66-110. Petitions and accounts, notices and hearings.

Every guardian who has received or shall receive on account of his ward any moneys or other thing of value from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall file with the court annually, on the anniversary date of the appointment, in addition to such other accounts as may be required by the court, a full, true, and accurate account under oath of all moneys or other things of value so received by him, all earnings, interest, or profits derived therefrom and all property acquired therewith and of all disbursements therefrom, including interest paid on any loan or debt, and showing the balance thereof in his hands at the date of the account and how invested.

The guardian, at the time of filing any account, shall exhibit all securities or investments held by him to an officer of the bank or other depository wherein said securities or investments are held for safekeeping or to an authorized representative of the corporation which is surety on his bond, or to the judge or clerk of a court of record in this state, or, upon request of the guardian or other interested party, to any other reputable person designated by the court, who shall certify in writing that he has examined the securities or investments and identified them with those described in the account, and shall note any omissions or discrepancies. If the depository is the guardian, the certifying officer shall not be the officer verifying the account. The guardian may exhibit the securities or investments to the judge of the court, who shall indorse on the account and copy thereof a certificate that the securities or investments shown therein as held by the guardian were each in fact exhibited to him and that those exhibited to him were the same as those shown in the account, and note any omission or discrepancy. That certificate and the certificate of an official of the bank in which are deposited any funds for which the guardian is accountable, showing the amount on deposit, shall be prepared and signed in duplicate and one (1) of each shall be filed by the guardian with his account.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-510; Acts 2005, No. 658, § 1.

28-66-111. Penalty for failure to account.

If any guardian shall fail to file with the court any account as required by this chapter, or by an order of the court, when any account is due, or within thirty (30) days after citation issues as provided by law, or shall fail to furnish the United States Department of Veterans Affairs a true copy of any account, petition, or pleading as required by this chapter, or fail to disclose the payment of interest on any loan or debt, such failure may in the discretion of the court be ground for his removal.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-511; Acts 2005, No. 658, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The language added by the amendment of this section by Acts 2005, No. 658, is not part of an official NCCUSL revision of the 1942 Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act.

28-66-112. Compensation of guardians.

Compensation payable to guardians shall be based upon services rendered and shall not exceed six percent (6%) of the amount of moneys received during the period covered by the account, provided that during any period in which benefits are not being paid for a ward, then compensation to guardians may instead be calculated on a basis not to exceed one percent (1%) of the market value of the estate of the ward per annum. In the event of extraordinary services by any guardian, the court, upon petition and hearing thereon may authorize reasonable additional compensation therefor. A copy of the petition and notice of hearing thereon shall be given the proper office of the Department of Veterans Affairs in the manner provided in the case of hearing on a guardian's account or other pleading. No commission or compensation shall be allowed on the moneys or other assets received from a prior guardian nor upon the amount received from liquidation of loans or other investments.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-512; Acts 1995, No. 503, § 1.

28-66-113. Investments.

A guardian shall invest the surplus funds of his or her ward's estate in securities or property as authorized under the laws of this state but only upon prior order of the court.

However, a guardian may invest surplus funds without prior court authorization in:

Direct unconditional interest-bearing obligations of this state or of the United States;

Obligations where the interest and principal are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States;

Bonds issued by a school district in this state;

Notes, bonds, debentures, or other similar obligations issued by a federal land bank, a federal intermediate credit bank, a bank for a cooperative, or any other obligation issued under the Farm Credit Act of 1971, 12 U.S.C. § 2001 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2019;

Bonds issued by a national mortgage association;

A certificate of deposit or another interest-bearing deposit account of a bank domiciled in this state that is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

However, an investment in a certificate of deposit or an interest-bearing deposit account shall not exceed the amount insured; or

Shares, share certificates, share accounts, or accounts of a:

Building and loan association organized under the laws of this state;

Federal savings and loan association domiciled in this state and insured by the Savings Association Insurance Fund; or

Credit union in this state for eligible members that is insured by the National Credit Union Administration.

Subdivision (a)(2)(G)(i)(c)(1) of this section does not expand the field of membership of a credit union.

An exchange-traded fund listed on a national securities exchange.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (c); and made stylistic changes in (a) and (b).

The 2019 amendment added (a)(2)(C) through (a)(2)(G).

However, an investment in shares, share certificates, share accounts, or accounts listed in subdivision (a)(2)(G)(i) of this section shall not exceed the amount insured.

A signed duplicate or certified copy of the petition for authority to invest shall be furnished to the proper office of the Veterans' Administration and a notice of hearing shall be given to the office for a hearing on a guardian's account.

If a guardian of the estate is a state or national bank or trust company authorized by provisions of §§28-69-201 —28-69-204 to establish and maintain common trust funds, the guardian may invest the ward's funds without prior order of the court in:

Participation in the common trust funds if they have been established and maintained by the guardian;

Shares, securities or other interests of any open-end or closed-end management-type investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2015; or

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 13; 1961, No. 36, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-513; Acts 2015, No. 1129, § 3; 2019, No. 591, § 2.

28-66-114. Maintenance and support.

A guardian shall not apply any portion of the income or the estate for the support or maintenance of any person other than the ward, the spouse, and the minor children of the ward, except upon petition to and prior order of the court after a hearing. A signed duplicate or certified copy of said petition shall be furnished the proper office of the Veterans' Administration and notice of hearing thereon shall be given said office as provided in the case of hearing on a guardian's account or other pleading.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-514.

28-66-115. Purchase of home for ward.

The court may authorize the purchase of the entire fee simple title to real estate in this state in which the guardian has no interest, but only as a home for the ward, or to protect his interest, or (if he is not a minor) as a home for his dependent family. Such purchase of real estate shall not be made except upon the entry of an order of the court after hearing upon verified petition. A copy of the petition shall be furnished the proper office of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and notice of hearing thereon shall be given said office as provided in the case of hearing on a guardian's account. As used in this subdivision (1), “no interest” means that a guardian should not even have a mortgage lien interest in the real estate purchased as a home for the ward.

Before authorizing such investment, the court shall require written evidence of value and of title and of the advisability of acquiring such real estate. Title shall be taken in the ward's name. This section does not limit the right of the guardian on behalf of his ward to bid and to become the purchaser of real estate at a sale thereof pursuant to decree of foreclosure of lien held by or for the ward, or at a trustee's sale, to protect the ward's right in the property so foreclosed or sold; nor does it limit the right of the guardian, if such be necessary to protect the ward's interest and upon prior order of the court in which the guardianship is pending, to agree with cotenants of the ward for a partition in kind, or to purchase from cotenants the entire undivided interest held by them, or to bid and purchase the same at a sale under a partition decree, or to compromise adverse claims of title to the ward's realty.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The language added by the amendment of this section by Acts 2005, No. 658, is not part of an official NCCUSL revision of the 1942 Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-515; Acts 2005, No. 658, § 3.

28-66-116. Copies of public records to be furnished.

When a copy of any public record is required by the Veterans' Administration to be used in determining the eligibility of any person to participate in benefits made available by the Veterans' Administration, the official custodian of such public record shall without charge provide the applicant for such benefits or any person acting on his behalf or the authorized representative of the Veterans' Administration with a certified copy of such record.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-516.

28-66-117. Discharge of guardian and release of sureties.

In addition to any other provisions of law relating to judicial restoration and discharge of guardian, a certificate by the Veterans' Administration showing that a minor ward has attained majority, or that an incompetent ward has been rated competent by the Veterans' Administration upon examination in accordance with law shall be prima facie evidence that the ward has attained majority, or has recovered his competency. Upon hearing after notice as provided by this chapter and the determination by the court that the ward has attained majority or has recovered his competency, an order shall be entered to that effect, and the guardian shall file a final account. Upon hearing after notice to the former ward and to the Veterans' Administration, as in case of other accounts, upon approval of the final account, and upon delivery to the ward of the assets due him from the guardian, the guardian shall be discharged and his sureties released.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-517.

28-66-118. Commitment to Veterans' Administration or other agency of United States Government.

Whenever, in any proceeding under the laws of this state for the commitment of a person alleged to be of unsound mind or otherwise in need of confinement in a hospital or other institution for his proper care, it is determined after such adjudication of the status of such person as may be required by law that commitment to a hospital for mental disease or other institution is necessary for safekeeping or treatment and it appears that such person is eligible for care or treatment by the Veterans' Administration or other agency of the United States Government, the court, upon receipt of a certificate from the Veterans' Administration or such other agency showing that facilities are available and that such person is eligible for care or treatment therein, may commit such person to said Veterans' Administration or other agency. The person whose commitment is sought shall be personally served with notice of the pending commitment proceeding in the manner as provided by the law of this state; and nothing in this chapter shall affect his right to appear and be heard in the proceedings. Upon commitment, such person when admitted to any facility operated by any such agency within or without this state shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the Veterans' Administration or other agency. The chief officer of any facility of the Veterans' Administration or institution operated by any other agency of the United States to which the person is so committed shall with respect to such person be vested with the same powers as superintendents of state hospitals for mental diseases within this state with respect to retention of custody, transfer, parole, or discharge. Jurisdiction is retained in the committing or other appropriate court of this state at any time to inquire into the mental condition of the person so committed and to determine the necessity for continuance of his restraint, and all commitments pursuant to this chapter are so conditioned.

The judgment or order of commitment by a court of competent jurisdiction of another state or of the District of Columbia, committing a person to the Veterans' Administration, or other agency of the United States Government for care or treatment shall have the same force and effect as to the committed person while in this state as in the jurisdiction in which is situated the court entering the judgment or making the order; and the courts of the committing state, or of the District of Columbia, shall be deemed to have retained jurisdiction of the person so committed for the purpose of inquiring into the mental condition of such person, and of determining the necessity for continuance of his restraint, as is provided in subsection (1) of this section with respect to persons committed by the courts of this state. Consent is hereby given to the application of the law of the committing state or district in respect to the authority of the chief officer of any facility of the Veterans' Administration, or of any institution operated in this state by any other agency of the United States to retain custody, or transfer, parole, or discharge the committed person.

Upon receipt of a certificate of the Veterans' Administration or such other agency of the United States that facilities are available for the care or treatment of any person heretofore committed to any hospital for the insane or other institution for the care or treatment of persons similarly afflicted and that such person is eligible for care or treatment, the superintendent of the institution may cause the transfer of such person to the Veterans' Administration or other agency of the United States for care or treatment. Upon effecting any such transfer, the committing court or proper officer thereof shall be notified thereof by the transferring agency. No person shall be transferred to the Veterans' Administration or other agency of the United States if he be confined pursuant to conviction of any felony or misdemeanor or if he has been acquitted of the charge solely on the ground of insanity, unless prior to transfer the court or other authority originally committing such person shall enter an order for such transfer after appropriate motion and hearing.

Any person transferred as provided in this section shall be deemed to be committed to the Veterans' Administration or other agency of the United States pursuant to the original commitment.

Publisher's Notes. This section may be superseded by §§20-47-402 —20-47-404, which are nearly identical to this section.

Cross References. Commitment, §20-47-401 et seq.

Under the revised Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act, the involuntary commitment of an incompetent veteran may be to Veterans Administration directly, or an eligible veteran committed originally to a state institution may be transferred to a Veterans Administration facility. Gidney v. Sterling, 202 F. Supp. 344 (E.D. Ark. 1962).

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-518.

28-66-119. Liberal construction.

This chapter shall be so construed to make uniform the law of these states which enact it.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-519.

28-66-120. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act.”

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-520.

28-66-121. Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-520n.

28-66-122. Modification of prior laws.

All acts or parts of acts relating to beneficiaries of the Veterans' Administration inconsistent with this chapter are hereby repealed, especially §§ 6318 to 6337 inclusive of Pope's Digest of the Statutes of Arkansas, and Act 283 of 1941. Except where inconsistent with this chapter, the laws of this state relating to guardian and ward and the judicial practice relating thereto, including the right to trial by jury and the right of appeal, shall be applicable to such beneficiaries and their estates.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-521.

28-66-123. Application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter relating to surety bonds and the administration of estates of wards shall apply to all “income” and “estate” as defined in §28-66-101 whether the guardian shall have been appointed under this chapter or under any other law of this state, special or general, prior or subsequent to the enactment hereof.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 23; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-522.

28-66-124. Time of taking effect.

This chapter shall take effect from and after June 10, 1943.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 177, § 24; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-522n.

Publisher's Notes. As enacted, this section provided that it would take effect “after its passage and approval.” It was approved on March 6, 1943. However, such effective date is invalid under Arkansas Tax Comm'r v. Moore, 103 Ark. 48, 145 S.W. 199 (1912), and Cunningham v. Walker, 198 Ark. 928, 132 S.W.2d 24 (1939). Consequently, the general effective date for the 1943 regular session has been inserted in this section.